Texas statutes.
SPECIAL DISTRICT LOCAL LAWS CODE

TITLE 6. WATER AND WASTEWATER

SUBTITLE A. DRAINAGE DISTRICTS

In accordance with Acts 2009, 81st Leg., Ch. 353, Sec. 3, if the creation of the district is not confirmed at a confirmation election before September 1, 2011, this chapter expires on that date.

CHAPTER 6606. STARR COUNTY DRAINAGE DISTRICT

SUBCHAPTER A. GENERAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 6606.001. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:

(1) "Board" means the district's board of directors.

(2) "Director" means a member of the board.

(3) "District" means the Starr County Drainage District.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 353 (H.B. 1178), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2009.

Sec. 6606.002. NATURE OF DISTRICT. The district is a drainage district created in Starr County under Section 59, Article XVI, Texas Constitution, subject to approval at a confirmation election under Section 6606.102.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 353 (H.B. 1178), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2009.

Sec. 6606.003. FINDINGS OF BENEFIT AND PURPOSE. (a) The district is created to serve a public use and benefit.

(b) All land and other property included in the district will benefit from the works and projects that are to be accomplished by the district under powers conferred by Section 59, Article XVI, Texas Constitution.

(c) The district is essential to accomplish the purposes of Section 59, Article XVI, Texas Constitution.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 353 (H.B. 1178), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2009.

Sec. 6606.004. DISTRICT TERRITORY. The district territory is coextensive with the boundaries of Starr County, Texas.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 353 (H.B. 1178), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2009.

SUBCHAPTER B. BOARD OF DIRECTORS

Sec. 6606.051. DIRECTORS. (a) The district is governed by a board of five directors consisting of the Commissioners Court of Starr County.

(b) Service on the board is an additional duty of office for a member of the Commissioners Court of Starr County.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 353 (H.B. 1178), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2009.

SUBCHAPTER C. POWERS AND DUTIES

Sec. 6606.101. GENERAL POWERS AND DUTIES. The district has all rights, powers, privileges, functions, and duties provided by the general law of this state applicable to a drainage district created under Section 59, Article XVI, Texas Constitution, including Chapters 49 and 56, Water Code.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 353 (H.B. 1178), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2009.

Sec. 6606.102. CONFIRMATION ELECTION. (a) The board shall hold an election to confirm the creation of the district.

(b) Section 41.001(a), Election Code, does not apply to a confirmation election under this section.

(c) Except as provided by this section, the confirmation election must be conducted as provided by Sections 49.102(a)-(f), Water Code, and the Election Code.

(d) The district is not required to elect directors at the confirmation election.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 353 (H.B. 1178), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2009.

Sec. 6606.103. UTILITY PROPERTY EXEMPTION FROM IMPACT FEES, STANDBY FEES, AND ASSESSMENTS. The district may not impose an impact fee, standby fee, or assessment on the property, including the equipment, rights-of-way, easements, facilities, or improvements, of:

(1) an electric utility or a power generation company as defined by Section 31.002, Utilities Code;

(2) a gas utility as defined by Section 101.003 or 121.001, Utilities Code;

(3) a telecommunications provider as defined by Section 51.002, Utilities Code; or

(4) a person who provides to the public cable television or advanced telecommunications services.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 353 (H.B. 1178), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2009.